District of Columbia statutes.
11-301

Jurisdiction of appeals from the District of Columbia Court of Appeals.

In addition to its jurisdiction as a United States court of appeals and any other jurisdiction conferred on it by law, the United States Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia Circuit has jurisdiction of appeals from judgments of the District of Columbia Court of Appeals —

(1)

with respect to violations of criminal laws of the United States which are not applicable exclusively to the District of Columbia if a petition for the allowance of an appeal from that judgment is filed within ten days after its entry; or

(2)

entered before the effective date of the District of Columbia Court Reorganization Act of 1970 in any other case if a petition for the allowance of an appeal from that judgment is filed within ten days after its entry.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 476, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 11-301.
1973 Ed., § 11-301.

References in Text

“The effective date of the District of Columbia Court Reorganization Act of 1970,” referred to in paragraph (2) of this section, means, as set forth in § 199(c) of the Act, the first day of the seventh calendar month which began after the enactment of the Act.